Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 3 OIL AND GAS WELLS — GEOLOGIC INFORMATION, AND PREVENTION OF WASTE
§ 47-318. Well spacing.

The department shall promptly establish spacing units for each pool except in those pools that have been developed to such an extent that it would be impracticable or unreasonable to establish spacing units at the existing stage of development.

An order establishing spacing units shall specify the size, shape and location of the units, which shall be such as will, in the opinion of the department, result in the efficient and economical development of the pool as a whole. Any unit established by the department shall be geographic. The geographic boundaries of the unit shall be described in accordance with the public land survey system. Except where circumstances, geologic or otherwise, affecting the orderly development of a pool reasonably require, or as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the size of the spacing units shall not be smaller than the maximum area that can be efficiently and economically drained by one (1) well; provided:

If, at the time of a hearing to establish spacing units, there is not sufficient evidence from which to determine the area that can be efficiently and economically drained by one (1) well, the department shall make an order establishing temporary spacing units for the orderly development of the pool, pending the obtaining of the information required to determine what the permanent spacing should be.

Where the federal agency administering federal minerals that would otherwise be included in a spacing unit has not leased or has failed to offer such federal minerals for lease auction for at least six (6) months, such federal minerals may be excluded from the unit upon application or upon the department’s own determination.

Except where circumstances, geologic or otherwise, affecting the orderly development of a pool reasonably require, spacing units shall be of approximately uniform size and shape for the entire pool. The department may establish spacing units of different sizes or shapes for different parts of a pool or may grant exceptions to the size, shape or location of any spacing unit or units or may change the sizes or shape of one (1) or more existing spacing units.

An order establishing spacing units shall direct that no more than one (1) well shall be drilled to and produced from the common source of supply on any unit, and shall specify the location for the drilling of a well thereon, in accordance with a reasonably uniform spacing pattern, with necessary exceptions for wells drilled or drilling at the time of the filing of the application. If the department finds that a well drilled at the prescribed location would not be likely to produce in paying quantities, or that surface conditions would substantially add to the burden or hazard of drilling such well, or for other good cause shown, the department is authorized to make an order permitting the well to be drilled at a location other than that prescribed by such spacing order. Application for an exception shall be filed with the department and may be granted where it is shown that good cause for such exception exists and that consent to such exception has been given by the operators of all drilling units directly or diagonally offsetting the drilling unit for which an exception is requested, and, as to the lands upon which drilling units have not been established, by the majority of mineral interest owners of those lands which would be included in directly or diagonally offsetting drilling units under said order, if said order were extended to include such additional lands.

An order establishing spacing units for a pool shall cover all lands determined or believed to be underlaid by such pool, and may be modified by the department from time to time to include additional lands determined to be underlaid by such pool or to exclude lands determined not to be underlaid by such pool. A pool may be divided into zones and a spacing unit for each zone may be established if necessary to prevent or assist in preventing waste of oil and gas, to avoid drilling unnecessary wells, to protect correlative rights or to facilitate production through the use of innovative drilling and completion methods. The spacing units within the zone may differ in size and shape from spacing units in any other zone but may not be smaller than the maximum area that can be efficiently and economically drained by one (1) well.
(6) An order establishing spacing units may be modified by the department to change the size, shape or location of one (1) or more spacing units, or to permit the drilling of additional wells on a reasonably uniform pattern. An operator may apply for changes to the size, shape or location of spacing units. The department will review applications to change the size, shape or location of spacing units.

An order establishing spacing units may be modified by the department to change the size, shape or location of one (1) or more spacing units, or to permit the drilling of additional wells on a reasonably uniform pattern. An operator may apply for changes to the size, shape or location of spacing units. The department will review applications to change the size, shape or location of spacing units.

Upon the filing of an application to establish spacing units, no additional well shall be commenced for production from the pool until the order establishing spacing units has been made, unless the commencement of the well is authorized by order of the department.

§ 47-319. Setbacks.

Except as provided in this section, oil and gas wells, tank batteries and gas processing facilities shall not be constructed within three hundred (300) feet of an existing occupied structure, domestic water well, canal, ditch or the natural or ordinary high-water mark of surface waters or within fifty (50) feet of a highway.

Oil and gas wells, tank batteries and gas processing facilities may be constructed less than three hundred (300) feet but more than one hundred (100) feet from an existing occupied structure, domestic water well, canal or ditch if the operator has obtained the express written permission from the owner of the occupied structure, domestic water well, canal or ditch.

§ 47-320. Integration of tracts — Orders of department.

When two (2) or more separately owned tracts are embraced within a spacing unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or a part of a spacing unit, the interested persons may integrate their tracts or interests for the development and operation of the spacing unit. In the absence of voluntary integration, the department, upon the application of any owner in that proposed spacing unit, shall order integration of all tracts or interests in the spacing unit for drilling of a well or wells, development and operation thereof and for the sharing of production therefrom. The department, as a part of the order establishing a spacing unit or units, may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the royalty interests in the unit or units shall, in the absence of voluntary agreement, be deemed to be integrated without the necessity of a subsequent separate order integrating the royalty interests. Each such integration order shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable.

All operations, including, but not limited to, the commencement, drilling, or operation of a well upon any portion of a spacing unit for which an integration order has been entered, shall be deemed for all purposes the conduct of such operations upon each separately owned tract in the spacing unit by the several owners thereof. That portion of the production allocated to a separately owned tract included in a spacing unit shall, when produced, be deemed, for all purposes, to have been actually produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon.

Each such integration order shall authorize the drilling, equipping and operation, or operation, of a well on the spacing unit; shall designate an operator for the integrated unit; shall prescribe the time and manner in which all the owners in the spacing unit may elect to participate therein; and shall make provision for the payment by all those who elect to participate therein of the reasonable actual cost thereof, plus a reasonable charge for supervision and interest. Each such integration order shall provide for the four (4) following options:

Working interest owner. An owner who elects to participate as a working interest owner shall pay the proportionate share of the actual costs of drilling and operating a well allocated to the owner’s interest in the spacing unit. Working interest owners who share in the costs of drilling and operating the well are entitled to their respective shares of the production of the well. The operator of the integrated spacing unit and working interest owners shall enter into a joint operating agreement approved by the department in the integration order.

Nonconsenting working interest owner. An owner who refuses to share in the risk and actual costs of drilling and operating the well, but desires to participate as a working interest owner, is a nonconsenting working interest owner. The operator of the integrated spacing unit shall be entitled to recover a risk penalty of up to three hundred percent (300%) of the nonconsenting working interest owner’s share of the cost of drilling and operating the well under the terms set forth in the integration order. After all the costs have been recovered by the consenting owners in the spacing unit, the nonconsenting owner is entitled to his respective shares of the production of the well, and shall be liable for his pro rata share of costs as if the nonconsenting owner had originally agreed to pay the costs of drilling and operating the well. The operator of the integrated spacing unit and nonconsenting working interest owners shall enter into a joint operating agreement approved by the department in the integration order.

Leased. An owner may enter into a lease with the operator of the integrated spacing unit under the terms and conditions in the integration order. The owner shall receive no less than one-eighth (1/8) royalty. The operator of an integrated spacing unit shall pay a leasing owner the highest bonus payment per acre that the operator paid to another owner in the spacing unit prior to the filing of the integration application.

Deemed leased. If an owner fails to make an election within the election period set forth in the integration order, such owner’s interest will be deemed leased under the terms and conditions in the integration order. The owner shall receive one-eighth (1/8) royalty. The operator of an integrated spacing unit shall pay a leasing owner the highest bonus payment per acre that the operator paid to another owner in the spacing unit prior to the filing of the integration application.

An application for an order integrating the tracts or interests in a spacing unit shall substantially contain and be limited to only the following:

The applicant’s name and address;

A description of the spacing unit to be integrated;

A geologic statement concerning the likely presence of hydrocarbons;

A statement that the proposed drill site is leased;

A statement of the proposed operations for the spacing unit, including the name and address of the proposed operator;

A proposed joint operating agreement and a proposed lease form;

A list of all uncommitted owners in the spacing unit to be integrated under the application, including names and addresses;

An affidavit indicating that at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the mineral interest acres in the spacing unit support the integration application by leasing or participating as a working interest owner;

An affidavit stating the highest bonus payment paid to a leased owner in the spacing unit being integrated prior to filing the integration application; and

A resume of efforts documenting the applicant’s good faith efforts on at least two (2) separate occasions within a period of time no less than sixty (60) days to inform uncommitted owners of the applicant’s intention to develop the mineral resources in the proposed spacing unit and desire to reach an agreement with uncommitted owners in the proposed spacing unit. Provided however, if any owner requests no further contact from the applicant, the applicant will be relieved of further obligation to attempt contact to reach agreement with that owner. At least one (1) contact must be by certified U.S. mail sent to an owner’s last known address. If an owner is unknown or cannot be found, the applicant must publish a legal notice of its intention to develop and request that the owner contact the applicant in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed spacing unit is located. The resume of efforts should indicate the applicant has made reasonable efforts to reach an agreement with all uncommitted owners in the proposed spacing unit. Reasonable efforts are met by complying with this subsection.

At the time the integration application is filed with the department, the applicant shall certify that, for uncommitted owners who are unknown or cannot be found, a notice of the application was published in a newspaper in the county where the proposed spacing unit is located. Each published notice shall include notice to the affected uncommitted owner of the opportunity to respond to the application, and the deadline by which a response must be filed with the department.
(6) An operator who has not been able to obtain consent from sixty-seven percent (67%) of the mineral interest acres in the spacing unit may nevertheless apply for an integration order under this section if all of the conditions set forth in this subsection have been met. The department shall issue an integration order, which shall affect only the unit area described in the application, if it finds that the operator has met all of the following conditions:

An operator who has not been able to obtain consent from sixty-seven percent (67%) of the mineral interest acres in the spacing unit may nevertheless apply for an integration order under this section if all of the conditions set forth in this subsection have been met. The department shall issue an integration order, which shall affect only the unit area described in the application, if it finds that the operator has met all of the following conditions:

The operator has obtained consent from at least fifty-five percent (55%) of mineral interest acres;

The operator has negotiated diligently and in good faith for a period of at least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to his application for an integration order; and

The uncommitted owners in the affected unit shall receive from the operator mineral lease terms and conditions that are no less favorable to the lessee than those set forth in section 47-331(2), Idaho Code.

An application for integration shall be subject to the procedures set forth in section 47-328, Idaho Code.

§ 47-321. Unit operations.

An agreement for the unit or cooperative development or operation of a field, pool, or part thereof, may be submitted to the department for approval as being in the public interest or reasonably necessary to prevent waste or protect correlative rights. Such approval shall constitute a complete defense to any suit charging violation of any statute of the state relating to trusts and monopolies on account thereof or on account of operations conducted pursuant thereto. The failure to submit such an agreement to the department for approval shall not for that reason imply or constitute evidence that the agreement or operations conducted pursuant thereto are in violation of laws relating to trusts and monopolies.

The department, upon its own determination or upon application of an owner, shall conduct a hearing to consider the need for unit operation of an entire pool or portion thereof, to increase ultimate recovery of oil and gas from that pool or portion thereof. The department shall issue an order requiring unit operation if it finds that:

Unit operation of the pool or portion thereof is reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights;

Unit operation of the pool or portion thereof is reasonably necessary for maintaining or restoring reservoir pressure, or to implement cycling, water flooding, enhanced recovery, horizontal drilling, de-watering or a combination of these operations or other operations or objectives to be cooperatively pursued with the goal of increasing the ultimate recovery of oil and gas; and

The estimated cost to conduct the unit operation will not exceed the value of the estimated recovery of additional oil and gas resulting from unit operation.

An application for requesting an order providing for the operation as a unit of one (1) or more pools or parts thereof in a field shall contain:

A plat map showing the proposed unit, the existing spacing units, and well(s) within the units;

The names and addresses of all persons owning mineral interests and working interests in the proposed unit;

An affidavit that the applicant, by certified mail, notified all persons owning unleased mineral interests and working interests in the proposed unit at least sixty (60) days prior to filing the application with the department of the applicant’s intention to make the application;

A proposed plan of unit operations for the proposed unit that contains the information in subsection (5) of this section; and

A proposed operating agreement that is consistent with the proposed plan of unit operations.

An application for unit operations shall be subject to the procedures set forth in section 47-328, Idaho Code.

An order for a unit operation must be upon just and reasonable terms and conditions and shall prescribe a plan for unit operations that include [includes] all of the following:

A description of the vertical and horizontal limits of the unit area;

A statement of the nature of the operation contemplated;

A provision for the supervision and conduct of the unit operation that designates an operator of the unit and provides a means to remove the operator and designate a successor operator;

A provision to protect correlative rights, allocating to each separately owned tract in the unit area a just and equitable share of the production that is produced and saved from the unit area, other than production used or unavoidably lost in the conduct of the unit operation;

A provision for credits and charges to adjust among working interest owners in the unit area for their interest in wells, tanks, pumps, machinery, materials and equipment that contribute to the unit operation;

A provision establishing how the costs of unit operation, including capital investments and costs of terminating the unit operation, shall be determined and charged to each working interest owner or the interest of each owner, including a provision establishing how, when and by whom the share of unit production allocated to an owner who does not pay the share of those costs charged to that owner or to the interest of that owner may be sold and the proceeds applied to the payment of that owner’s share of those costs, and how accounts will be settled upon termination of the unit;

A provision, if necessary, for carrying or otherwise financing an owner who elects to be carried or otherwise financed, which allows owners who carry or otherwise finance to recover up to three hundred percent (300%) of the unit costs attributed to an owner who elects to be carried or otherwise financed payable out of that owner’s share of the production;

A time when the unit operation is to commence and the manner in which, and the circumstances under which, the unit operation is to terminate and the unit is to be dissolved; and

Additional provisions found to be appropriate to carry on the unit operation, to prevent waste and to protect correlative rights.

An order for a unit operation may provide for a unit operation of less than the whole of a pool as long as the unit area is of size and shape reasonably required for that purpose and the conduct thereof will have no significant adverse effect upon other portions of the pool.

The department, upon its own determination or upon the application of an owner, may for good cause terminate a unit operation and dissolve the unit on just and equitable terms. If not terminated earlier, the unit operation shall terminate upon final cessation of production from the pool or unitized portion thereof, the plugging and abandonment of unit wells and facilities, and reclamation of the surface.

An order requiring a unit operation shall not become effective until the plan for unit operations approved by the department has been signed and approved in writing by the owners who, under the department’s order, will be required to pay at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the costs of the unit operation, and also signed and approved in writing by the working interest owners of at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the production of the unit operations, and the department has made a finding in the order that the plan for unit operations has been so approved.

An order providing for unit operation may be amended by an order of the department in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an original order providing for the unit operation.

The department may issue an order for the unit operation of a pool or pools or parts thereof that includes a unit created by a prior order of the department or by voluntary agreement. This subsequent order, in providing for the allocation of the unit’s production, must treat first the unit area previously created as a single tract and then allocate, in the same proportions as those specified in the prior order, the portion of the new unit’s production allocated to the previous unit among the separately owned tracts included in the previously created unit area.
(11) The department may approve additions to the unit of portions of a pool not previously included within the unit and may extend the unit area as reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights. The department may approve exclusions from the unit area as reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights. An order adding to or excluding from a unit area must be upon just and reasonable terms.

The department may approve additions to the unit of portions of a pool not previously included within the unit and may extend the unit area as reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights. The department may approve exclusions from the unit area as reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights. An order adding to or excluding from a unit area must be upon just and reasonable terms.

An order that amends a plan of unit operations and adds an area to a previously established unit shall not become effective until the amended plan of unit operations has been signed and approved in writing by the owners who will be required to pay at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the costs of the unit operation in the area to be added, and also signed and approved in writing by the working interest owners of at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the production of the unit operations, and the department has made a finding in the order that the plan for unit operations has been so approved.

An order providing for an exclusion from a unit area may not become effective until an amended plan of unit operations excluding an area from the unit has been approved in writing by the owners in the original unit area that are required to pay at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the costs of unit operations, and also approved in writing by the working interest owners in the original unit area required to pay at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the production of the unit operations, and the department has made a finding in the order that the plan for unit operations has been so approved.

Operations, including the commencement, drilling or operation of a well upon a portion of a unit area, are deemed conducted on each separately owned tract in the unit area by the owner or owners thereof. That portion of a unit’s production allocated to a separately owned tract in a unit area, when produced, is deemed produced from a well drilled on that tract. Operations conducted under an order of the department providing for a unit operation shall constitute fulfillment of expressed or implied obligations of a lease or contract covering lands within the unit area to the extent that compliance with those obligations is not possible without a further order of the department.

That portion of unit production allocated to a tract and the proceeds of sale for that portion are deemed the property and income of the several persons to whom or to whose credit that portion is allocated or payable under the order providing for unit operation.

A division order or other contract relating to a sale or purchase of production from a separately owned tract or combination of tracts remains in force and applies to oil and gas allocated to the tract until terminated in accordance with provisions of the order providing for unit operation, or in accordance with the terms of such division order or other contract.

Except to the extent that all affected parties agree, an order providing for unit operation does not result in a transfer of all or part of a person’s title to the oil and gas rights in a tract in the unit area.

Except to the extent that all affected parties agree, all property, whether real or personal, that may be acquired in the conduct of a unit operation hereunder is deemed acquired for the account of the owners within the unit area and is deemed the property of the owners in the proportion that the expenses of the unit operation are charged.

§ 47-322. Oil and gas metering systems.

Each meter shall be properly constructed, maintained, repaired and operated to continually and accurately register the quantity of oil and gas produced from the well.

The meter shall be installed, used and operated according to industry standards and guidelines promulgated by the American petroleum institute, American gas association, and the gas processors association that are in effect at the time of installation of the meter. If standards conflict, the most current American petroleum institute standard shall apply.

All custody transfer meters and all allocation meters used in the allocation of custody transfer volumes shall be calibrated by a third party at least quarterly in each calendar year. The records of calibrations shall be maintained by the operator of the meter for at least five (5) years and copies shall be submitted to the department.

§ 47-323. Commingling of production.

A producer shall not, prior to metering, commingle production from two (2) or more oil and gas wells without prior approval from the department after notice and opportunity for hearing.

§ 47-324. Reporting requirements.

All reporting parties shall file the applicable reports described in this section to the department within the time frames provided. Each report shall be completed on forms prescribed by the department.

Monthly production report. Operators shall file monthly production reports to properly account for all oil, gas and water production and disposition from each well, including the amounts of oil and gas sold from each well. Production reports shall be filed on the required form before the fifteenth day of the second calendar month following the month of production.

Gathering facility report. Operators of a gathering facility shall file monthly reports concerning the operation of the plant on the required form before the fifteenth day of the second calendar month following the month of operation.

Gas processing plant report. The operator of each plant manufacturing or extracting liquid hydrocarbons, including gasoline, butane, propane, condensate, kerosene or other derivatives from natural gas, or refinery or storage vapors, shall file a report concerning the operation of the plant on the required form before the fifteenth day of the second calendar month following the month of operation.

Monthly transportation and storage report. Each gatherer, transporter, storer or handler of crude oil or hydrocarbon products, or both, shall file monthly reports showing the required information concerning the transportation operations of the gatherer, transporter, storer or handler before the fifteenth day of the second calendar month following the month of operation. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the operator of any refinery, processing plant, blending plant or treating plant if the operator of the well has filed the required form.

Monthly purchaser report. Any person who purchases or is entitled to purchase any product that is subject to the state of Idaho severance tax from the producer or operator of a lease located in this state shall file monthly reports to account for the purchase of all hydrocarbons, including volume and price paid. Purchaser reports shall be filed on the required form before the fifteenth day of the second calendar month following the month in which the hydrocarbons were purchased.

All well test reports. An operator shall file all well test reports within thirty (30) days of completing or recompleting the well. The reports shall include all oil, gas and water produced during all tests.

Well production potential test reports. Unless otherwise provided for in this section, each operator of producing gas or oil wells shall test each producing well for a twenty-four (24) hour period every six (6) months and shall record all oil, gas and water volumes, including choke size, pressures and any interim bottom hole pressure surveys every six (6) months, resulting from the test on the form.

Logs. An operator shall file all logs, including but not limited to those listed in this subsection, not later than thirty (30) days after the date the log was run, if run:

An open hole electrical, radioactivity or other similar log, or combination of open hole logs of the operator’s choice;

A gamma ray log from total depth to ground level elevations. The operator may require a shorter-logged interval if it determines that the log is unnecessary or impractical or if hole conditions risk jeopardizing the open hole; and
(c) A cement bond log across the casing, verifying the formation seal integrity and isolation.

Additional reports. An operator shall file a drilling, completion, workover or plugging report within thirty (30) days of completing or plugging the well.

The department shall report quarterly to the commission on the produced volumes of oil and gas, sales volumes of oil and gas, and the meeting of industry standards.

Should an operator fail to comply with this section, the commission may assess a penalty in accordance with section 47-329(3), Idaho Code, or may order the well or oil and gas facilities to be shut-in, after notice, opportunity to cure, and opportunity for a hearing.

§ 47-325. Falsification of records — Limitation of actions.

Any person who, for the purpose of evading this act or any rule, regulation or order of the commission shall make or cause to be made any false entry in any report, record, account, or memorandum required by this act, or by any such rule, regulation or order, or shall omit, or cause to be omitted, from any such report, record, account, or memorandum, full, true and correct entries as required by this act, or by any such rule, regulation or order, or shall remove from this state or destroy, mutilate, alter or falsify any such record, account, or memorandum, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding twelve (12) months, or to both such fine and imprisonment.

No suit, action or other proceeding based upon a violation of this act or any rule, regulation or order of the commission hereunder shall be commenced or maintained unless same shall have been commenced within one (1) year from date of the alleged violation. Provided however, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to actions governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 47-326. Public data.

Subject only to any applicable provisions of section 47-327, Idaho Code, the following data is public information that shall not be considered trade secret information under chapter 8, title 48, Idaho Code, nor be exempt from public records disclosure under chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. Except as provided in section 47-327, Idaho Code, the department shall, upon receipt of the information, make publicly available all data under this section on its website without requiring any person to submit a public records request:

All reports required under section 47-324(1) through (5), Idaho Code;

All well plats; and

All state-required permits, except seismic data.

The department shall provide complete internet access to all documents in subsection (1) of this section, not granted confidential status, on its website by no later than December 31, 2017.

A claim to exempt data from disclosure shall be supported and accompanied by a specific citation to the law authorizing an exemption from disclosure and an explanation of how the data meets the standards for being withheld from disclosure. When a portion of a record or a portion of a page in that record is subject to disclosure and the other portion is subject to a claim that it is exempt from disclosure under this chapter or chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, the person making the claim must clearly identify the portion claimed as exempt and the portion not claimed as exempt from disclosure at the time of submittal.

§ 47-327. Confidentiality of well and trade information.

Information that shall be held confidential from the public includes logs of a well granted confidential well status pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, electrical or radioactivity logs, electromagnetic or magnetic surveys, core descriptions and analyses, maps, and other geological, geophysical and engineering information. Seismic data shall remain confidential from all parties at the discretion of the operator due to the nature of purchasing and licensing such data.

An operator may request confidential well status at the time of filing an application for a permit to drill. The information in the application form itself will not be confidential.

Confidential status shall be granted and shall include all pertinent data and information relating to drilling completion and testing the well. Such information shall be kept confidential from the public for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days after completion of the well.

Well test results shall be kept confidential from the public for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days after completion of the test.

No extensions shall be allowed beyond the one hundred eighty (180) day confidentiality period.

An operator may request that well logs for a well with confidential well status be held confidential.

To obtain confidential treatment of a well log, the operator of the well shall place the log in an envelope, noting log readings and marked “confidential.”

An operator may request, and the department may grant, an additional six (6) months of confidentiality for well logs.

Confidential status for a well log shall terminate six (6) months after the run date on the log or, in the case of an extension, twelve (12) months after the run date on the log. Confidential status for a well log shall not continue for a period in excess of twelve (12) months from the date the log was run on the well.

The state tax commission, the oil and gas conservation commission, the Idaho geologic [geological] survey and other state agencies shall share oil and gas records when necessary for those agencies to carry out their duties assigned by law, regardless of whether the records are held confidential from the public under this section. This sharing of records shall not render the shared records subject to disclosure to the public under the public records act.

All state agencies, state employees, contract personnel, temporary personnel and their agents or affiliates shall be governed by the confidentiality provisions of this section and shall be subject to sections 74-117 and 74-118, Idaho Code, should any information or records protected under statute be disclosed.